Utah statutes.
11-49-402.   Chair as presiding officer.

(1)  Except as expressly provided otherwise in this chapter, the chair of the commission is vested with the power to direct the commission during meetings authorized by this chapter.

(2)  Unless expressly prohibited from doing so under this chapter, the commission may overrule a decision of the chair by using the following procedure:

(a)  If a member objects to a decision of the chair, that member may appeal the decision by stating:

(i)  "I appeal the decision of the chair."; and

(ii)  the basis for the objection.

(b)  A motion described in Subsection (2)(a) is nondebatable.

(c)  The chair shall direct a roll call vote to determine if the commission supports the decision of the chair.

(d)  A majority vote of the commission is necessary to overrule the decision of the chair.

(3)  The chair may set time limitations on any part of a meeting or hearing authorized by this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

